Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2360.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 15-2404, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-2404. State control over nonpublic schools; prohibition; application A. This chapter does not permit allow any government agency to exercise control or supervision over any nonpublic school or homeschool. B. A qualified school that accepts a payment from a parent pursuant to this chapter is not an agent of the state or federal government. C. A qualified school shall not be required to alter its creed, practices, admissions policy or curriculum in order to accept students whose parents pay tuition or fees from an Arizona empowerment scholarship account pursuant to this chapter in order to participate as a qualified school. A qualified school may not require a parent or a qualified student to disclose either of the following as a condition of enrollment in the qualified school: 1. Whether the qualified student is enrolled in the Arizona empowerment scholarship accounts program. 2. The amount that is deposited in the qualified student's Arizona empowerment scholarship account pursuant to section 15-2402, subsection C. D. In any legal proceeding challenging the application of this chapter to a qualified school, the state bears the burden of establishing that the law is necessary and does not impose any undue burden on qualified schools. END_STATUTE